Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 446A.082, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Grant amount. The grant amount for an eligible project under this program shall be for an amount up to deleted text begin 50deleted text end new text begin 80new text end percent of the eligible as-bid project cost up to deleted text begin $5,000,000deleted text end new text begin $12,000,000new text end , minus the amount of federal emerging contaminant funds the project receives under section 446A.081, subdivision 9, paragraph (b), clause (4), or other federal emerging contaminant funds.